Wyoming, session 2025, HB0293.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-14-801(d)(intro) is amended to
read:

39-14-801. Severance tax distributions; distribution
account created; formula.

HB0293

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0710
(d) After making distributions pursuant to
subsections (b), (c), (f) and (j) of this section,
distributions under subsection (e) of this section shall be
made from the severance tax distribution account. The
amount of distributions under subsection (e) of this
section shall not exceed one hundred fifty-five million
dollars ($155,000,000.00) in any fiscal year. To the extent
that distributions under subsection (e) of this section
would exceed that amount in any fiscal year, except as
provided in subsections (g), (h), and (k) and (m) of this
section, the excess shall be credited:

Section 2. W.S. 21-13-306.1 and 39-14-801(m) are
repealed.

Section 3. 2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 118,
Section 314 is repealed.

Section 4. The school foundation program reserve
account is repealed.

Section 5. On the effective date of this act, all
funds in the school foundation program reserve account
HB0293

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0710
shall be transferred by the state auditor to the common
school permanent fund reserve account created under W.S.
9-4-719(f). Notwithstanding W.S. 9-4-719(f), any unexpended
funds that have been appropriated or obligated from the
school foundation program reserve account before the
effective date of this act shall be paid from the common
school permanent fund reserve account. Any funds that are
directed to revert by law to the school foundation program
reserve account shall revert to the common school permanent
fund reserve account. All accrued revenues that would
otherwise be deposited in the school foundation program
reserve account shall be deposited in the common school
permanent fund reserve account.

Section 6. Not later than October 31, 2026 and again
not later than October 31, 2027, the state auditor shall
report to the joint appropriations committee on the amounts
transferred under section 5 of this act.

HB0293

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0710
Section 7. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0293